Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2468.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1607-Z of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1607-Z. Funding.The department shall accept funds from the following sources:* * *(3) For fiscal year 2026-2027, the sum of not less than $19,000,000 to the extent appropriated by the General Assembly to the department for the purposes of this article.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2468PN3301 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617